Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 33 Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to licensing of hearing aid specialists, see chapter 35 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).